California, session 20252026, AB1828.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 6405 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:6405. (a) (1) An application for a certificate of registration by an individual shall be accompanied by a bond of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) executed by a corporate surety qualified to do business in this state and conditioned upon compliance with this chapter. The total aggregate liability on the bond shall be limited to twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).(2) An application for a certificate of registration by a partnership or corporation shall be accompanied by a bond executed by a corporate surety qualified to do business in this state and conditioned upon compliance with this chapter in the following amount, based on the total number of legal document assistants and unlawful detainer assistants employed by the partnership or corporation:(A) Twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for one to four assistants.(B) Fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for five to nine assistants.(C) One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for 10 or more assistants. An application for a certificate of registration by a person employed by a partnership or corporation shall be accompanied by a bond of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) only if the partnership or corporation has not posted a bond in the amount required by this subdivision.(3) If a partnership or corporation increases the number of assistants it employs above the number stated in its application for a certificate of registration, the partnership or corporation shall promptly increase the bond to the applicable amount in subparagraphs (B) or (C) of paragraph (2) based on the actual number of assistants it employs, and shall promptly submit the increased bond to the county clerk.(4) The bond may be terminated pursuant to Section 995.440 of, and Article 13 (commencing with Section 996.310) of Chapter 2 of Title 14 of Part 2 of, the Code of Civil Procedure.(b) The county clerk shall, upon filing of the bond, deliver the bond forthwith to the county recorder for recording. The recording fee specified in Section 27361 of the Government Code shall be paid by the registrant. The fee may be paid to the county clerk who shall transmit it to the recorder.(c) The fee for filing, canceling, revoking, or withdrawing the bond is seven dollars ($7).(d) The county recorder shall record the bond and any notice of cancellation, revocation, or withdrawal of the bond, and shall thereafter mail the instrument, unless specified to the contrary, to the person named in the instrument and, if no person is named, to the party leaving it for recording. The recording fee specified in Section 27361 of the Government Code for notice of cancellation, revocation, or withdrawal of the bond shall be paid to the county clerk, who shall transmit it to the county recorder.(e) In lieu of the bond required by subdivision (a), a registrant may deposit the amount required by subdivision (a) in cash with the county clerk.(f) If the certificate is revoked, the bond or cash deposit shall be returned to the bonding party or depositor subject to subdivision (g) and the right of a person to recover against the bond or cash deposit under Section 6412.(g) The county clerk may retain a cash deposit until the expiration of three years from the date the registrant has ceased to do business, or three years from the expiration or revocation date of the registration, in order to ensure there are no outstanding claims against the deposit. A judge may order the return of the deposit prior to the expiration of three years upon evidence satisfactory to the judge that there are no outstanding claims against the deposit.(h) The bond required by this section shall be in favor of the State of California for the benefit of any person who is damaged as a result of the violation of this chapter or by the fraud, dishonesty, or incompetency of an individual, partnership, or corporation registered under this chapter. The bond required by this section shall also indicate the name of the county in which it will be filed.(i) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 6405 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:6405. (a) (1) An application for a certificate of registration by an individual shall be accompanied by a bond of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) executed by a corporate surety qualified to do business in this state. The bond shall be conditioned upon compliance with this chapter and executed in accordance with Section 995.630 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The total aggregate liability on the bond shall be limited to twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).(2) An application for a certificate of registration by a partnership or corporation shall be accompanied by a bond executed by a corporate surety qualified to do business in this state and conditioned upon compliance with this chapter in the following amount, based on the total number of legal document assistants and unlawful detainer assistants employed by the partnership or corporation:(A) Twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for one to four assistants.(B) Fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for five to nine assistants.(C) One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for 10 or more assistants. An application for a certificate of registration by a person employed by a partnership or corporation shall be accompanied by a bond of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) only if the partnership or corporation has not posted a bond in the amount required by this subdivision.(3) If a partnership or corporation increases the number of assistants it employs above the number stated in its application for a certificate of registration, the partnership or corporation shall promptly increase the bond to the applicable amount in subparagraphs (B) or (C) of paragraph (2) based on the actual number of assistants it employs, and shall promptly submit the increased bond to the county clerk.(4) The bond may be terminated pursuant to Section 995.440 of, and Article 13 (commencing with Section 996.310) of Chapter 2 of Title 14 of Part 2 of, the Code of Civil Procedure.(b) The fee for filing, canceling, revoking, or withdrawing the bond is determined by Section 54985 of the Government Code.(c) The county clerk shall file the bond and any notice of cancellation, revocation, or withdrawal of the bond.(d) In lieu of the bond required by subdivision (a), a registrant may deposit the amount required by subdivision (a) in cash with the county clerk.(e) If the certificate is revoked, the bond or cash deposit shall be returned to the bonding party or depositor subject to subdivision (f) and the right of a person to recover against the bond or cash deposit under Section 6412.(f) The county clerk may retain a cash deposit until the expiration of three years from the date the registrant has ceased to do business, or three years from the expiration or revocation date of the registration, in order to ensure there are no outstanding claims against the deposit. A judge may order the return of the deposit prior to the expiration of three years upon evidence satisfactory to the judge that there are no outstanding claims against the deposit.(g) The bond required by this section shall be in favor of the State of California for the benefit of any person who is damaged as a result of the violation of this chapter or by the fraud, dishonesty, or incompetency of an individual, partnership, or corporation registered under this chapter. The bond required by this section shall also indicate the name of the county in which it will be filed.(h) The county clerk shall retain the bond for a minimum of six years from the filing date.(i) The county clerk shall provide to the registrant one certified copy of the bond on file, which shall serve as official proof of compliance with the bonding requirements of this section. The certified copy shall be provided to the registrant, within a reasonable period following filing, either by mail or by another accessible method established by the county clerk.(j) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.SEC. 3. Section 22353 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:22353. (a) A certificate of registration shall be accompanied by a bond of two thousand dollars ($2,000), executed by an admitted surety insurer and conditioned upon compliance with the provisions of this chapter and all laws governing the service of process in this state. The total aggregate liability on the bond is limited to two thousand dollars ($2,000). As an alternative to the bond, the registrant may deposit with the clerk, cash or a money order in the amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000).(b) The county clerk shall, upon filing the bond, deliver the bond forthwith to the county recorder for recording. The recording fee specified in Section 27361 of the Government Code shall be paid by the registered process server. The fee may be paid to the county clerk, who shall transmit it to the recorder.(c) The fee for filing, canceling, revoking, or withdrawing the bond is seven dollars ($7).(d) The county recorder shall record the bond and any notice of cancellation, revocation, or withdrawal of the bond, and shall thereafter mail the instrument, unless specified to the contrary, to the person named in the instrument and, if no person is named, to the party leaving it for recording. The recording fee specified in Section 27361 of the Government Code for the notice of cancellation, revocation, or withdrawal of the bond shall be paid to the county clerk, who shall transmit it to the county recorder.(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 4. Section 22353 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:22353. (a) A certificate of registration shall be accompanied by a bond of two thousand dollars ($2,000), executed by an admitted surety insurer and conditioned upon compliance with the provisions of this chapter and all laws governing the service of process in this state. The bond shall be executed in accordance with Section 995.630 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The total aggregate liability on the bond is limited to two thousand dollars ($2,000). As an alternative to the bond, the registrant may deposit with the clerk, cash or a money order in the amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000).(b) The fee for filing, canceling, revoking, or withdrawing the bond is determined by Section 54985 of the Government Code.(c) The county clerk shall file the bond and any notice of cancellation, revocation, or withdrawal of the bond.(d) The county clerk shall retain the bond for a minimum of six years from the filing date.(e) The county clerk shall provide to the registrant one certified copy of the bond on file, which shall serve as official proof of compliance with the bonding requirements of this section. The certified copy shall be provided to the registrant, within a reasonable period following filing, either by mail or by another accessible method established by the county clerk.(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.SEC. 5. Section 22455 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:22455. (a) A certificate of registration shall be accompanied by a bond of five thousand dollars ($5,000) which is executed by a corporate surety qualified to do business in this state and conditioned upon compliance with the provisions of this chapter and all laws governing the transmittal of confidential documentary information under the code sections specified in Section 22450. The total aggregate liability on the bond shall be limited to five thousand dollars ($5,000). The bond may be terminated pursuant to the provisions of Section 995.440 and Article 13 (commencing with Section 996.310) of Chapter 2 of Title 14 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.(1) The county clerk shall, upon filing the bond, deliver the bond forthwith to the county recorder for recording. The recording fee specified in Section 27361 of the Government Code shall be paid by the registered professional photocopier. The fee may be paid to the county clerk, who shall transmit it to the recorder.(2) The fee for filing, canceling, revoking, or withdrawing the bond is seven dollars ($7).(3) The county recorder shall record the bond and any notice of cancellation, revocation, or withdrawal of the bond, and shall thereafter mail the instrument, unless specified to the contrary, to the person named in the instrument and, if no person is named, to the party leaving it for recording. The recording fee specified in Section 27361 of the Government Code for the notice of cancellation, revocation, or withdrawal of the bond shall be paid to the county clerk, who shall transmit it to the county recorder.(b) In lieu of the bond required by subdivision (a), a registrant may deposit five thousand dollars ($5,000) in cash with the county clerk.(c) If the certificate is revoked, the bond or cash deposit shall be returned to the bonding party or depositor subject to the provisions of subdivision (d) and the right of a person to recover against the bond or cash deposit under Section 22459.(d) The county clerk may retain a cash deposit until the expiration of three years from the date the registrant has ceased to do business, or three years from the expiration or revocation date of the registration, in order to ensure there are no outstanding claims against the deposit. A judge of a superior court may order the return of the deposit prior to the expiration of three years upon evidence satisfactory to the judge that there are no outstanding claims against the deposit.(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 6. Section 22455 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:22455. (a) A certificate of registration shall be accompanied by a bond of five thousand dollars ($5,000) which is executed by a corporate surety qualified to do business in this state and conditioned upon compliance with the provisions of this chapter and all laws governing the transmittal of confidential documentary information under the code sections specified in Section 22450. The bond shall be executed in accordance with Section 995.630 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The total aggregate liability on the bond shall be limited to five thousand dollars ($5,000). The bond may be terminated pursuant to the provisions of Section 995.440 and Article 13 (commencing with Section 996.310) of Chapter 2 of Title 14 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.(1) The fee for filing, canceling, revoking, or withdrawing the bond is determined by Section 54985 of the Government Code.(2) The county clerk shall file the bond and any notice of cancellation, revocation, or withdrawal of the bond.(b) In lieu of the bond required by subdivision (a), a registrant may deposit five thousand dollars ($5,000) in cash with the county clerk.(c) If the certificate is revoked, the bond or cash deposit shall be returned to the bonding party or depositor subject to the provisions of subdivision (d) and the right of a person to recover against the bond or cash deposit under Section 22459.(d) The county clerk may retain a cash deposit until the expiration of three years from the date the registrant has ceased to do business, or three years from the expiration or revocation date of the registration, in order to ensure there are no outstanding claims against the deposit. A judge of a superior court may order the return of the deposit prior to the expiration of three years upon evidence satisfactory to the judge that there are no outstanding claims against the deposit.(e) The county clerk shall retain the bond for a minimum of six years from the filing date.(f) The county clerk shall provide to the registrant one certified copy of the bond on file, which shall serve as official proof of compliance with the bonding requirements of this section. The certified copy shall be provided to the registrant, within a reasonable period following filing, either by mail or by another accessible method established by the county clerk.(g) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.SEC. 7. Section 8213 of the Government Code is amended to read:8213. (a) No later than 30 days after the beginning of the term prescribed in the commission, every person appointed a notary public shall file an official bond and an oath of office in the office of the county clerk of the county within which the person maintains a principal place of business as shown in the application submitted to the Secretary of State, and the commission shall not take effect unless this is done within the 30-day period. A person appointed to be a notary public shall take and subscribe the oath of office either in the office of that county clerk or before another notary public in that county. If the oath of office is taken and subscribed before the county clerk, the person appointed to be a notary public shall present an identification document meeting the requirements of subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (3), or of subparagraph (A) or (E) or of paragraph (4), of subdivision (b) of Section 1185 of the Civil Code to the county clerk as satisfactory evidence of identity. If the oath of office is taken and subscribed before a notary public, the oath and bond may be filed with the county clerk by certified mail or any other means of physical delivery that provides a receipt. Upon the filing of the oath and bond, the county clerk shall immediately transmit to the Secretary of State a certificate setting forth the fact of the filing and containing a copy of the official oath, personally signed by the notary public in the form set forth in the commission and shall immediately deliver the bond to the county recorder for recording. The county clerk shall retain the oath of office for one year following the expiration of the term of the commission for which the oath was taken, after which the oath may be destroyed or otherwise disposed of. The copy of the oath, personally signed by the notary public, on file with the Secretary of State may at any time be read in evidence with like effect as the original oath, without further proof.(b) If a notary public transfers the principal place of business from one county to another, the notary public may file a new oath of office and bond, or a duplicate of the original bond with the county clerk to which the principal place of business was transferred. If the notary public elects to make a new filing, the notary public shall, within 30 days of the filing, obtain an official seal which shall include the name of the county to which the notary public has transferred. In a case where the notary public elects to make a new filing, the same filing and recording fees are applicable as in the case of the original filing and recording of the bond.(c) If a notary public submits an application for a name change to the Secretary of State, the notary public shall, within 30 days from the date an amended commission is issued, file a new oath of office and an amendment to the bond with the county clerk in which the principal place of business is located. The amended commission with the name change shall not take effect unless the filing is completed within the 30-day period. The amended commission with the name change takes effect the date the oath and amendment to the bond is filed with the county clerk. If the principal place of business address was changed in the application for name change, either a new or duplicate of the original bond shall be filed with the county clerk with the amendment to the bond. The notary public shall, within 30 days of the filing, obtain an official seal that includes the name of the notary public and the name of the county to which the notary public has transferred, if applicable.(d) The recording fee specified in Section 27361 of the Government Code shall be paid by the person appointed a notary public. The fee may be paid to the county clerk who shall transmit it to the county recorder.(e) The county recorder shall record the bond and shall thereafter mail, unless specified to the contrary, it to the person named in the instrument and, if no person is named, to the party leaving it for recording.(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 8. Section 8213 is added to the Government Code, to read:8213. (a) No later than 30 days after the beginning of the term prescribed in the commission, every person appointed a notary public shall file an official bond and an oath of office in the office of the county clerk of the county within which the person maintains a principal place of business as shown in the application submitted to the Secretary of State, and the commission shall not take effect unless this is done within the 30-day period. The official bond shall be executed in accordance with Section 995.630 of the Code of Civil Procedure. A person appointed to be a notary public shall take and subscribe the oath of office either in the office of that county clerk or before another notary public in that county. If the oath of office is taken and subscribed before the county clerk, the person appointed to be a notary public shall present an identification document meeting the requirements of subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (3), or of subparagraph (A) or (E) of paragraph (4), of subdivision (b) of Section 1185 of the Civil Code to the county clerk as satisfactory evidence of identity. If the oath of office is taken and subscribed before a notary public, the oath and bond may be filed with the county clerk by certified mail or any other means of physical delivery that provides a receipt. Upon the filing of the oath and bond, the county clerk shall immediately transmit to the Secretary of State a certificate setting forth the fact of the filing and containing a copy of the official oath, personally signed by the notary public in the form set forth in the commission. The county clerk shall retain the oath of office for 10 years following the expiration of the term of the commission for which the oath was taken, after which the oath may be destroyed or otherwise disposed of. The copy of the oath, personally signed by the notary public, on file with the Secretary of State may at any time be read in evidence with like effect as the original oath, without further proof.(b) If a notary public transfers the principal place of business from one county to another, the notary public may file a new oath of office and bond, or a duplicate of the original bond with the county clerk to which the principal place of business was transferred. The official bond shall be executed in accordance with Section 995.630 of the Code of Civil Procedure. If the notary public elects to make a new filing, the notary public shall, within 30 days of the filing, obtain an official seal which shall include the name of the county to which the notary public has transferred. In a case where the notary public elects to make a new filing, the same filing fees are applicable as in the case of the original filing of the bond.(c) If a notary public submits an application for a name change to the Secretary of State, the notary public shall, within 30 days from the date an amended commission is issued, file a new oath of office and an amendment to the bond with the county clerk in which the principal place of business is located. The amended commission with the name change shall not take effect unless the filing is completed within the 30-day period. The amended commission with the name change takes effect the date the oath and amendment to the bond is filed with the county clerk. If the principal place of business address was changed in the application for name change, either a new or duplicate of the original bond shall be filed with the county clerk with the amendment to the bond. The notary public shall, within 30 days of the filing, obtain an official seal that includes the name of the notary public and the name of the county to which the notary public has transferred, if applicable.(d) The fee for filing the bond is determined by Section 54985.(e) The county clerk shall retain the official bond for 10 years from the date of filing.(f) The county clerk shall provide to the registrant one certified copy of the bond on file, which shall serve as official proof of compliance with the bonding requirements of this section. The certified copy shall be provided to the registrant, within a reasonable period following filing, either by mail or by another accessible method established by the county clerk.(g) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.SEC. 9. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.SECTION 1.Section 6405 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:6405.(a)(1)An application for a certificate of registration by an individual shall be accompanied by a bond of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) executed by a corporate surety qualified to do business in this state. The bond shall be conditioned upon compliance with this chapter and executed in accordance with Section 995.630 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The total aggregate liability on the bond shall be limited to twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).(2)An application for a certificate of registration by a partnership or corporation shall be accompanied by a bond executed by a corporate surety qualified to do business in this state and conditioned upon compliance with this chapter in the following amount, based on the total number of legal document assistants and unlawful detainer assistants employed by the partnership or corporation:(A)Twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for one to four assistants.(B)Fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for five to nine assistants.(C)One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for 10 or more assistants. An application for a certificate of registration by a person employed by a partnership or corporation shall be accompanied by a bond of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) only if the partnership or corporation has not posted a bond in the amount required by this subdivision.(3)If a partnership or corporation increases the number of assistants it employs above the number stated in its application for a certificate of registration, the partnership or corporation shall promptly increase the bond to the applicable amount in subparagraphs (B) or (C) of paragraph (2) based on the actual number of assistants it employs, and shall promptly submit the increased bond to the county clerk.(4)The bond may be terminated pursuant to Section 995.440 of, and Article 13 (commencing with Section 996.310) of Chapter 2 of Title 14 of Part 2 of, the Code of Civil Procedure.(b)The fee for filing, canceling, revoking, or withdrawing the bond is determined by Section 54985 of the Government Code.(c)The county clerk shall file the bond and any notice of cancellation, revocation, or withdrawal of the bond.(d)In lieu of the bond required by subdivision (a), a registrant may deposit the amount required by subdivision (a) in cash with the county clerk.(e)If the certificate is revoked, the bond or cash deposit shall be returned to the bonding party or depositor subject to subdivision (f) and the right of a person to recover against the bond or cash deposit under Section 6412.(f)The county clerk may retain a cash deposit until the expiration of three years from the date the registrant has ceased to do business, or three years from the expiration or revocation date of the registration, in order to ensure there are no outstanding claims against the deposit. A judge may order the return of the deposit prior to the expiration of three years upon evidence satisfactory to the judge that there are no outstanding claims against the deposit.(g)The bond required by this section shall be in favor of the State of California for the benefit of any person who is damaged as a result of the violation of this chapter or by the fraud, dishonesty, or incompetency of an individual, partnership, or corporation registered under this chapter. The bond required by this section shall also indicate the name of the county in which it will be filed.(h)The county clerk shall retain the bond for a minimum of six years from the filing date.(i)The county clerk shall provide to the registrant one certified copy of the bond on file, which shall serve as official proof of compliance with the bonding requirements of this section. The certified copy shall be provided to the registrant, within a reasonable period following filing, either by mail or by another accessible method established by the county clerk.SEC. 2.Section 22353 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:22353.(a)A certificate of registration shall be accompanied by a bond of two thousand dollars ($2,000), executed by an admitted surety insurer and conditioned upon compliance with the provisions of this chapter and all laws governing the service of process in this state. The bond shall be executed in accordance with Section 995.630 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The total aggregate liability on the bond is limited to two thousand dollars ($2,000). As an alternative to the bond, the registrant may deposit with the clerk, cash or a money order in the amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000).(b)The fee for filing, canceling, revoking, or withdrawing the bond is determined by Section 54985 of the Government Code.(c)The county clerk shall file the bond and any notice of cancellation, revocation, or withdrawal of the bond.(d)The county clerk shall retain the bond for a minimum of six years from the filing date.(e)The county clerk shall provide to the registrant one certified copy of the bond on file, which shall serve as official proof of compliance with the bonding requirements of this section. The certified copy shall be provided to the registrant, within a reasonable period following filing, either by mail or by another accessible method established by the county clerk.SEC. 3.Section 22455 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:22455.(a)A certificate of registration shall be accompanied by a bond of five thousand dollars ($5,000) which is executed by a corporate surety qualified to do business in this state and conditioned upon compliance with the provisions of this chapter and all laws governing the transmittal of confidential documentary information under the code sections specified in Section 22450. The bond shall be executed in accordance with Section 995.630 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The total aggregate liability on the bond shall be limited to five thousand dollars ($5,000). The bond may be terminated pursuant to the provisions of Section 995.440 and Article 13 (commencing with Section 996.310) of Chapter 2 of Title 14 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.(1)The fee for filing, canceling, revoking, or withdrawing the bond is determined by Section 54985 of the Government Code.(2)The county clerk shall file the bond and any notice of cancellation, revocation, or withdrawal of the bond.(b)In lieu of the bond required by subdivision (a), a registrant may deposit five thousand dollars ($5,000) in cash with the county clerk.(c)If the certificate is revoked, the bond or cash deposit shall be returned to the bonding party or depositor subject to the provisions of subdivision (d) and the right of a person to recover against the bond or cash deposit under Section 22459.(d)The county clerk may retain a cash deposit until the expiration of three years from the date the registrant has ceased to do business, or three years from the expiration or revocation date of the registration, in order to ensure there are no outstanding claims against the deposit. A judge of a superior court may order the return of the deposit prior to the expiration of three years upon evidence satisfactory to the judge that there are no outstanding claims against the deposit.(e)The county clerk shall retain the bond for a minimum of six years from the filing date.(f)The county clerk shall provide to the registrant one certified copy of the bond on file, which shall serve as official proof of compliance with the bonding requirements of this section. The certified copy shall be provided to the registrant, within a reasonable period following filing, either by mail or by another accessible method established by the county clerk.SEC. 4.Section 8213 of the Government Code is amended to read:8213.(a)No later than 30 days after the beginning of the term prescribed in the commission, every person appointed a notary public shall file an official bond and an oath of office in the office of the county clerk of the county within which the person maintains a principal place of business as shown in the application submitted to the Secretary of State, and the commission shall not take effect unless this is done within the 30-day period. The official bond shall be executed in accordance with Section 995.630 of the Code of Civil Procedure. A person appointed to be a notary public shall take and subscribe the oath of office either in the office of that county clerk or before another notary public in that county. If the oath of office is taken and subscribed before the county clerk, the person appointed to be a notary public shall present an identification document meeting the requirements of subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (3), or of subparagraph (A) or (E) or paragraph (4), of subdivision (b) of Section 1185 of the Civil Code to the county clerk as satisfactory evidence of identity. If the oath of office is taken and subscribed before a notary public, the oath and bond may be filed with the county clerk by certified mail or any other means of physical delivery that provides a receipt. Upon the filing of the oath and bond, the county clerk shall immediately transmit to the Secretary of State a certificate setting forth the fact of the filing and containing a copy of the official oath, personally signed by the notary public in the form set forth in the commission. The county clerk shall retain the oath of office for 10 years following the expiration of the term of the commission for which the oath was taken, after which the oath may be destroyed or otherwise disposed of. The copy of the oath, personally signed by the notary public, on file with the Secretary of State may at any time be read in evidence with like effect as the original oath, without further proof.(b)If a notary public transfers the principal place of business from one county to another, the notary public may file a new oath of office and bond, or a duplicate of the original bond with the county clerk to which the principal place of business was transferred. The official bond shall be executed in accordance with Section 995.630 of the Code of Civil Procedure. If the notary public elects to make a new filing, the notary public shall, within 30 days of the filing, obtain an official seal which shall include the name of the county to which the notary public has transferred. In a case where the notary public elects to make a new filing, the same filing fees are applicable as in the case of the original filing of the bond.(c)If a notary public submits an application for a name change to the Secretary of State, the notary public shall, within 30 days from the date an amended commission is issued, file a new oath of office and an amendment to the bond with the county clerk in which the principal place of business is located. The amended commission with the name change shall not take effect unless the filing is completed within the 30-day period. The amended commission with the name change takes effect the date the oath and amendment to the bond is filed with the county clerk. If the principal place of business address was changed in the application for name change, either a new or duplicate of the original bond shall be filed with the county clerk with the amendment to the bond. The notary public shall, within 30 days of the filing, obtain an official seal that includes the name of the notary public and the name of the county to which the notary public has transferred, if applicable.(d)The fee for filing the bond is determined by Section 54985.(e)The county clerk shall retain the official bond for 10 years from the date of filing.(f)The county clerk shall provide to the registrant one certified copy of the bond on file, which shall serve as official proof of compliance with the bonding requirements of this section. The certified copy shall be provided to the registrant, within a reasonable period following filing, either by mail or by another accessible method established by the county clerk. SEC. 5.No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.